Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3304
Legal expense insurance business; authorization by director; exceptions.

(1) No person may conduct a legal expense insurance business in this state unless authorized to do so by the director.

(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to any person issuing group, blanket, or franchise policies if fewer than twenty-five percent of the certificate holders or insureds reside in this state and the person is regulated to a comparable extent by another state in which a larger number of certificate holders or insureds reside.

Laws 1979, LB 52, § 4.